Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.160.020

Authorization for private school students to ride buses—Conditions.

Every school district board of directors may authorize children attending a private school approved in accordance with RCW 28A.195.010 to ride a school bus or other student transportation vehicle to and from school so long as the following conditions are met:

(1) The board of directors shall not be required to alter those bus routes or stops established for transporting public school students;

(2) Private school students shall be allowed to ride on a seat-available basis only; and

(3) The board of directors shall charge an amount sufficient to reimburse the district for the actual per seat cost of providing such transportation.

[ 1990 c 33 s 133; 1981 c 307 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.24.065.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 307: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1981 c 307 s 2.]